Maine, session 132, LD1037.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §577-A, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 476, §9, is amended
to read:
10. Report. Beginning January 15, 2021, and annually thereafter, the council shall
submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
environment and natural resources matters describing the activities of the council, the
subcommittee and its working groups over the prior calendar year and including any
findings and recommendations of the council, including any proposed legislation.
Beginning January 15, 2026, the report must include specific recommendations to lower
the energy burden for residents of the State. After reviewing the report, the joint standing
committee may report out legislation to implement any recommendations contained in the
report.